Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1608
Appurtenant works, defined.

Appurtenant works include, but are not limited to: Structures such as spillways, either in or separate from the dam; the reservoir and its rim; low-level outlet works; and water conduits including, but not limited to, tunnels, pipelines, or penstocks, either through the dam or its abutments.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 8.